Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.210

Local primaries.

All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for special purpose districts, except those districts that require ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to voting, shall be nonpartisan. City, town, and district primaries shall be held as provided in RCW 29A.04.311.

The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220, as a uniform procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, and district elections. These provisions supersede any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different election requirements.

[ 2013 c 11 s 51; 2003 c 111 s 1305. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 89; 1977 c 53 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 1; 1965 c 123 s 7; 1965 c 9 s 29.21.010; prior: 1951 c 257 s 7; 1949 c 161 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5179-1. Formerly RCW 29.21.010.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 16.]